Oklahoma, session 2026, SB788.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 24-162 of Title 70, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Students’


Bill of Rights”.





Req. No. 1103 Page 1


B. A student enrolled in and attending a public school district


or public charter school in this state shall be afforded the


following rights:


1. The right to a safe learning environment including the right


to be free from bullying and threatening behavior as defined in


Section 24-100.3 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


2. The right to an unbiased education that does not endorse,


favor, or promote socialism, communism, or Marxism and that is free


from anti-American bias;


3. The right to an unbiased learning environment that includes,


but is not limited to:


a. the right to a classroom environment that is free from


the display of flags or propaganda of any organization


or symbol of socialism, communism, Marxism, or anti-


American sentiment, and


b. the right to attend or participate in school-sponsored


or school-sanctioned events or activities that are


free from the display of flags or propaganda that is


paid for with public funds and that represents any


organization or symbol of socialism, communism,


Marxism, or anti-American sentiment;


4. The right of self-defense if attacked on school property or


during a school event;



Req. No. 1103 Page 2


5. The right to public and free expression of religion, speech,


and peaceable assembly including, but not limited to:


a. the right to participate or lead in voluntary prayer


pursuant to the provisions of Section 11-101.1 of


Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


b. the right to observe one minute of silence each day


pursuant to the provisions of Section 11-101.2 of


Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


c. the right to read religious texts of his or her


choosing during free time, and


d. the right to an unbiased education that does not


endorse, favor, promote, demean, show hostility


toward, or intentionally undermine any particular


religion or nonreligious faith or religious


perspective;


6. The right to an appropriate relationship with teachers and


school employees that is free from actions that constitute a crime


or an attempted crime under state statute;


7. The right to be free from the use of vulgar language


directed toward other individuals by other students, teachers,


athletic coaches, and school district employees;


8. The right to have a parent, legal guardian, or legal counsel


present if he or she is being questioned concerning potentially


illegal conduct; and

Req. No. 1103 Page 3


9. The right to be free from punishment or penalty at school or


during school-related activities for lawfully exercising his or her


rights or engaging in lawful conduct outside of school hours and


outside of school property or school events.


C. 1. A student or the parent or legal guardian of a student


who believes the student’s rights provided for in subsection B of


this section have been violated may submit in writing a demand for


enforcement of his or her rights. Within seven (7) business days of


receipt of the demand, the school shall submit a response in writing


admitting to or denying the allegation.


2. The student or the parent or legal guardian of the student


may file an action to enforce the rights outlined in subsection B of


this section. If the student or the parent or legal guardian of the


student is the prevailing party, the court shall award reasonable


attorney fees.


3. An action may not be brought for a violation of the


provisions of paragraph 1 of subsection B of this section unless a


student or the parent or legal guardian of the student has notified


the school of ongoing bullying or threatening behavior, the school


has failed to address the bullying or threatening behavior by


allowing the alleged bully to remain in contact with an alleged


victim, and the continued bullying or threatening behavior rises to


the level of continual harassment. An action may not be brought



Req. No. 1103 Page 4


prior to a second or subsequent incident within twelve (12) calendar


months.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1103 EB 1/19/2025 5:43:19 AM































Req. No. 1103 Page 5